en: T70 Khorasan wheat flours
fr: Farines de blé khorasan T70, Farines de Kamut T70

en: T110 Khorasan wheat flours
fr: Farines de blé khorasan T110, Farines de Kamut T110

en: T130 Khorasan wheat flours
fr: Farines de blé khorasan T130, Farines de Kamut T130

en: Whole Khorasan wheat flours, Whole Kamut flours
es: Harinas de trigo de Jorasán integrales, Harinas de Kamut integrales
fr: Farines de blé khorasan T150, Farines de Kamut T150
hr: Cjelovito pšenično brašno khorasan

en: Spelt flours
bg: Брашно от спелта
de: Dinkelmehle, Dinkelmehl
es: Harinas de espelta, Harinas de escaña mayor, Harinas de escanda mayor
fi: spelttijauhot
fr: Farines d'épeautre, farines de grand épeautre
hr: Brašna od pira
it: Farine di farro
lt: Spelta miltai
nl: Speltmelen

en: Bread flours
de: Brotmehle
fr: Farines de pain
hr: Brašna za kruh
nl: Broodmelen
ru: Мука хлебопекарная

en: Wheat bread flour
ru: Мука пшеничная хлебопекарная

en: White spelt flours
es: Harinas de espelta blancas

en: T65 Spelt flours
fr: Farines d'épeautre T65
hr: T65 brašna od pira
nl: T65 speltmelen

en: T110 Spelt flours
fr: Farines d’épeautre T110
hr: T110 brašna od pira
nl: T110 speltmelen

en: Spelt flours Type 630
de: Dinkelmehle Type 630
fr: Farines d’épeautre T630
hr: Brašno od pira tip 630

en: Spelt flours Type 812
de: Dinkelmehle Type 812
fr: Farines d’épeautre T812
hr: Brašno od pira tip 812

en: Spelt flours Type 1050
de: Dinkelmehle Type 1050
fr: Farines d’épeautre T1050
hr: Brašno od pira tip 1050
nl: Speltmeel type 1050

en: Whole spelt flours
bg: Пълнозърнесто брашно от спелта
de: Vollkorndinkelmehle
es: Harinas de espelta integrales
hr: Cijela brašna od pira
nl: Volkoren speltmelen

fr: Farines de gruau
nl: Gruttenmelen

en: Fermenting flours
fr: Farines fermentante
hr: Brašna za fermentaciju
nl: Zelfrijzende bloem

en: Wheat malt flours
es: Harinas de trigo malteadas, Harinas de malta de trigo
fr: Farines de malt de blé
hr: Brašna od pšeničnog slada
nl: Tarwemoutmelen

en: Flour for tempura
fr: Farines pour tempura

en: Cereal germs
es: Gérmenes de cereales
fr: Germes de céréales
hr: Žitne klice
lt: Javų gemalai
nl: Kiemen van granen

en: Corn germ, Maize germ
es: Germen de maíz
fr: Germe de maïs
hr: Kukuruzne klice
lt: Kukurūzų gemalai
nl: Maïskiemen